Utah statutes.
63I-2-263.   Repeal dates, Title 63A to Title 63M.

(1)  Section 63A-1-115 is repealed on July 1, 2014.

(2)  Subsection 63M-1-903(1)(d) is repealed on July 1, 2015.



Amended by Chapter 173, 2013 General Session

